Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 9. Alaska Higher Education Investment Fund.

Sec. 37.14.750.
Alaska higher education investment fund established.

The Alaska higher education investment fund is established in the general fund for the purpose of making grants awarded under AS

14.43.400

—

14.43.420

by appropriation to the account established under AS

14.43.915(a)

and of making scholarship payments to qualified postsecondary institutions for students under AS

14.43.810

—

14.43.849

by appropriation to the account established under AS

14.43.915(b)

. Money in the fund does not lapse. The fund consists of

money appropriated to the fund;

income earned on investment of fund assets;

donations to the fund; and

money redeposited under AS

14.43.915(c)

.

The legislature may appropriate any amount to the fund established in (a) of this section. Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

As soon as is practicable after July 1 of each year, the commissioner of revenue shall determine the market value of the fund established in this section on June 30 for the immediately preceding fiscal year. The commissioner shall identify seven percent of that amount as available for appropriation as follows:

one-third for the grant account established under AS

14.43.915(a)

, from which the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education may award grants; and

two-thirds for the scholarship account established under AS

14.43.915(b)

, from which the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education may award scholarships.

In this section, unless the context requires otherwise, “fund” means the Alaska higher education investment fund established in (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 13 ch 74 SLA 2012)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 27, ch. 74, SLA 2012 provides that the Alaska higher education investment fund established in this section “is the fund identified in sec. 20(f), ch. 5, FSSLA 2011.”
That subsection appropriated $400,000,000 in receipts of the Alaska Housing Capital Corporation “to a fund created for the purpose of providing education grants or performance scholarships, or both, by the Twenty-Seventh Alaska State Legislature.”